Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB536.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "noncertified copy of original birth record" in section 2911 of Title 23 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 2911. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this subchapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Noncertified copy of original birth record." A [summary] photocopy of original birth record[, similar in form to a certified copy of an original birth record and consisting of only the names and ages of the birth parents, the date and county of the birth of the child and the name given to the child 123456789101112131415161718 at birth.] with the following notation: "This is not a certified copy of a birth record."* * *Section 2. Section 2937(a) and (c) of Title 23 are amended to read:§ 2937. Original birth record.(a) General rule.--Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an adoptee who is at least 18 years of age [and who has graduated from high school, completed a General Educational Development program or has legally withdrawn from secondary schooling] or, if the adoptee is deceased, the adoptee's descendants, may apply to the Department of Health for the adoptee's noncertified copy of original birth record. Subject to [subsections (b) and (c)] subsection (b), the Department of Health shall issue a noncertified copy of original birth record within 45 days of receipt of an application if the application complies with the requirements of subsection (d).* * *[(c) Redaction request form.--A birth parent may request that the birth parent's name be redacted from a noncertified copy of original birth record issued to an adoptee in accordance with the following:(1) The Department of Health shall prescribe a birth parent's name redaction request form. The form shall include all of the following:(i) Information about the procedures and requirements for a birth parent to do either of the following:(A) Have the form placed in the adoption file of the adoptee who is the birth child of the birth 20250HB0536PN0529 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 parent so that the birth parent's name is redacted from the noncertified copy of original birth record issued to the adoptee.(B) Have the form removed from the adoption file of the adoptee if the birth parent later decides to permit the birth parent's name to be included on the noncertified copy of original birth record.(ii) Provisions necessary for the Department of Health to be able to identify the adoption file of the adoptee to whom the form pertains.(iii) A place for the birth parent to attest that the birth parent is the birth parent of the adoptee to whom the form pertains.(2) The Department of Health shall make a birth parent's name redaction request form available upon request following the effective date of this subsection. The Department of Health shall accept a name redaction request form if all of the following apply:(i) The form has been notarized.(ii) The birth parent provides two items of identification of the birth parent.(iii) If a medical history for the birth parent was not previously prepared, or the medical history was prepared but needs to be updated, the birth parent does the following, as appropriate:(A) Completes a medical history form.(B) Updates the birth parent's medical history information.(iv) The Department of Health is satisfied that the form has been substantially completed.20250HB0536PN0529 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) The Department of Health shall file an accepted name redaction request form in the adoption file of the adoptee to whom the form pertains.(4) A birth parent may request at any time that the Department of Health remove the name redaction request form from the adoption file of the adoptee to whom the form pertains. The Department of Health shall remove the form if the birth parent provides the department all of the following:(i) Two items of identification of the birth parent.(ii) Information the Department of Health needs to be able to identify the adoption file of the adoptee to whom the form pertains.(iii) A notarized attestation that the birth parent is the birth parent of the adoptee to whom the form pertains.(5) A name redaction request form removed from an adoption file shall be destroyed.(6) The Department of Health shall include on its Internet website information about birth parents' name redaction request forms. All of the following information shall be provided:(i) The purpose of the form.(ii) The procedures to be followed and requirements to be met for the Department of Health to accept the form.(iii) The date when birth parents may begin to file the form with the Department of Health.(iv) The procedures to be followed and requirements to be met for having the form removed from an adoption 20250HB0536PN0529 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 file.(v) Any other information the Department of Health considers necessary.(7) If the birth parent dies after submitting a name redaction request form, a noncertified copy of original birth record may be provided to the adoptee without redaction of the deceased birth parent's name.]* * *Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0536PN0529 - 5 - 123456789